Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1241.02
Personal watercraft; operation requirements.

(1) A personal watercraft may not be operated on the waters of this state unless each person aboard the personal watercraft is wearing a United States Coast Guard-approved floatation device approved for use on personal watercraft.

(2) Each person operating a personal watercraft on the waters of this state which is equipped by the manufacturer with a lanyard-type engine cutoff switch shall attach the lanyard to the operator's person, clothing, or floatation device as appropriate.

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 103;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 22.
July 18, 2026